en: imazalil
xx: imazalil
de: Imazalil
fa: انیل‌کونازول
fi: imatsaliili
ja: イマザリル

en: frying
fr: friture
hr: prženje
it: fritto, frittura

en: caramel syrup
bg: карамелен сироп
ca: xarop de carmel, caramel liquid
cs: karamelový sirup
da: karamelsukkersirup
de: Karamellsirup, Caramelsirup, Karamell-Sirup
es: jarabe de caramelo, sirope de caramelo, caramelo líquido
fi: Karamellisiirappi
fr: sirop de caramel, sirop caramel
hr: karamel sirup, karamelizirani sirup, karamelov sirup
hu: karamellszirup, karamell szirup, karamell-szirup, karamella szirup
it: sciroppo di caramello
ja: キャラメルシロップ, カラメルシラップ
lt: karamelizuotas sirupas, karamelizuoto sirupo
nl: Karamel siroop
pl: syrop karmelowy
pt: xarope de caramelo
ru: Карамельный сироп
uk: карамельный сироп

en: caramelised sugar syrup, caramel sugar syrup
bg: сироп от карамелизирана захар, карамелизиран захарен сироп
ca: xarop de sucre caramelitzat
da: karamelliseret sukkersirup, karameliseret sukkersirup
de: Caramelzuckersirup, Karamellzuckersirup, Karamell-Zuckersirup, karamellisierter Zuckersirup
es: jarabe de azúcar caramelizado, sirope de azúcar caramelizado
et: karamelliseeritud suhkrusiirup
fi: karamellisoitu sokerisiirappi, karamellisokerisiirappi
fr: sirop de sucre caramel, sirop de sucre caramélisé
hr: karamelni šećerni sirup, sirup karameliziranog šećera, sirup od karameliziranog šećera, karamelizirani šećerni sirup, karamela šećerni sirup
hu: karamellizált cukorszirup
it: sciroppo di zucchero caramellato
lt: karamelizuotas cukraus sirupas
lv: karamelizēts cukura sīrups
nl: gekarameliseerde suikerstroop, gebrande suikerstroop, karamelsuikerstroop, karamelsuikersiroop, karamelstroop, kandijstroop
pl: karmelizowany syrop cukrowy, syrop cukru skarmelizowanego, syrop cukru karmelizowanego, syrop cukru palonego, syrop palonego cukru, syrop ze skarmelizowanego cukru
pt: xarome de açúcar caramelizado
sv: karamelliserad sockersirap, karamelliserat sockersirap, karamelliserad sirap, karamellsockersirap

fr: caramel au lait
hu: tejkaramella
it: caramello al latte

en: caramel chocolate preparation
hr: karamelno čokoladni pripravak
it: preparazione di cioccolato al caramello

en: salted butter caramel
de: gesalzene Karamellbutter, gesalzenes Butter-Karamell
es: caramelo a la mantequilla salada
fi: Suolainen kinuski
fr: caramel au beurre salé
hr: karamel od slanog maslaca
hu: sós vajkaramella, vajkaramell
it: caramello di burro salato
nl: gekarameliseerde gezouten boter, karamel en gezouten boter

fr: éclats de caramel
de: Caramelstücke, Karamellstücke, Karamellsplitter
fi: toffeepala
sv: karamellbitar

en: carotenoids, cartenoids, tetraterpenoids
ar: كاروتينات
be: каратыноід
bg: Каротиноид
ca: Carotenoide, carotenoides
cs: karotenoidy
de: Carotinoide, Karotinoide
el: Καροτενοειδές
eo: Karotenoido
es: Carotenoide, carotenoides
et: Karotenoidid
eu: Karotenoide
fa: کاروتنوئید
fi: karotenoidi, karotenoidit
fr: caroténoïde, caroténoïdes
ga: Caraitéinóideach
gl: Carotenoide
he: קרוטנואיד
hr: karotenoidi
hu: Karotinoidok
hy: Կարոտինոիդներ
id: Karotenoid
it: Carotenoidi
ja: カロテノイド, カロチノイド
kk: Каратиноидтар
ko: 카로티노이드
ku: Karotenoîd
ky: Каротиноиддер
lt: Karotinoidai
lv: Karotinoīdi
nl: carotenoïde
nn: karotenoid
pl: karotenoidy
pt: carotenoide
ro: Carotenoidă
ru: каротиноид
sh: Karotenoid
sr: Каротеноид
sv: Karotenoid
tr: Karotenoid
uk: Каротиноїди
vi: Carotenoid
zh: 類胡蘿蔔素

en: carotene, carotin, mixed carotenes
ar: كاروتين
be: Карацін
bg: Каротин, каротини
bs: Karoten
ca: Carotè, carotens
cs: Karoteny
da: Karotin
de: Carotine, Carotin
eo: Karoteno
es: Caroteno, carotenos
et: Karoteenid
eu: Karoteno
fa: کاروتن
fi: karoteeni, karoteenit
fr: Carotène
ga: Caraitéin
gl: Caroteno
he: קרוטן
hr: karoteni
hu: Karotinok, karotin
hy: Կարոտին
id: Karotena
io: Karotino
it: Carotene
ja: カロテン, カロテン色素
kk: Каротин
ko: 카로틴
lt: karotinas
mk: Каротен
ms: Karotena
my: ကဲရော့တင်း
nl: Caroteen
nn: Karoten
no: Karoten
pl: Karoteny
pt: Caroteno, carotenos
ro: Caroten
ru: Каротин, краситель-каротин
sh: Karoten
sk: Karotén
sr: Karoten
sv: Karoten
th: แคโรทีน
tr: Karoten
uk: Каротин
zh: 胡蘿蔔素

en: paprika extract, e160c
bg: екстракт от червен пипер, екстракт от паприка, паприка екстракт
bs: ekstrakt paprike
ca: extracte de pebre vermell, extracte de pebre vermell picant
da: paprikaekstrakt
de: Paprikaextrakt
el: εκχύλισμα πάπρικας
es: extracto de pimentón
fi: paprikauute
fr: extrait de paprika, extraits de paprika
hu: paprikakivonat
it: estratto di paprica, estratto di paprika
lt: paprikos ekstraktas
lv: paprikas ekstrakts
nl: paprika-extract
pl: kapsaicyna, ekstrakt z papryki, ekstrakty z papryki, ekstrakt z papryk
pt: extrato de pimentão, extrato de pimento, extracto de pimentão, extracto de pimento
ro: extract de paprika
sv: Paprikaextrakt

en: natural paprika extract
de: natürlicher Paprikaextrakt, natürliches Paprikaextrakt
fr: extrait naturel de paprika
hr: prirodni ekstrakt paprike
it: estratto naturale di paprica, estratto naturale di paprika
lt: natūralus paprikos ekstraktas
pt: extrato natural de pimentão, extrato natural de pimento, extracto natural de pimentão, extracto natural de pimento

en: paprika oleoresin, capsanthin
ca: Oleorresina de pebre vermell, Oleoresin de pebre vermell
es: Oleoresina de pimentón
fi: kapsantiini
fr: oléorésine de paprika, capsanthine
hr: uljana smola paprike
hu: Paprika oleorezin
it: capsantina, oleoresina di paprica, oleoresina di paprika

en: capsicum extract
bg: екстракт от капсацин
da: capsicum ekstrakt
de: Capsaicin-Extrakt
es: extracto de capsicum
fr: extrait de capsicum
hr: ekstrakt paprike
it: estratto di capsaicina, estratto di capsicina, estratto di capseicina
nl: capsicum-extract

en: capsicum oleoresin, capsicum oleo-resin, oleoresin capsicum
de: Capsicum-Oleoresin
es: oleorresina de capsicum
fr: oléorésine de Capsicum
nl: Capsicum-Oleoresin

en: soya lecithin, soy lecithin, soybean lecithin, emulsifer soya lecithin
bg: соев лецитин, соеви лецитини
bs: emulgator sojin lecitin
ca: Lecitina de soja, lecitines de soja
cs: sójový lecitin, sójové lecitiny
da: sojalecitin, sojalecitiner, sojalecithin, sojalecithiner, E322 af soja, E322 sojalecithin
de: Sojalecithine, Sojalecithin, Soja-Lecithine, Emulgator Sojalecithine, Soja-Lecithin, Emulgator Sojalecithin
el: λεκιθίνη σόγιας
es: lecitina de soja, lecitina de soya, lecitinas de soja, lecitinas de soya
et: sojaletsitiin
fi: soijalesitiini, soijalesitiiniä, soijalesitiinit, E322 soijasta
fr: lécithine de soja, lécithines de soja, lécithine de soja e322
he: לציטין סויה
hi: सोया लेसिथिन
hr: emulgator soja lecitin, emulgator sojin lecitin, soja lecitin, emulgatori sojin lecitin, sojin lecithin, sojin lecitin, sojini lecitini
hu: szójalecitin, szójalecitinek
id: lesitin kedelai
is: sojalesitin
it: lecitina di soia, lecitine di soia
ja: 大豆レシチン
ko: 대두 레시틴
lt: sojos lecitinas, sojų lecitinai, sojų pupelių lecitinai, emulsikliai sojos lecitinas
lv: sojas lecitīns
nb: soyalecitin, soyalecitiner
nl: sojalecithine, soja lecithine, sojalecithinen
nn: sojalecitin
pl: lecytyna sojowa, lecytyny sojowe, lecytyna z soi, lecytyny z soi
pt: lecitina de soja
ro: lecitină din soia, lecitina din soia, lecitină de soia, lecitina de soia, lecitine din soia
ru: соевый лецитин, лецитин соевый, эмульгатор лецитин соевый, эмульгатор соевый лецитин
sk: sójový lecitin
sl: sojin lecitin
sr: sojin lecitin
sv: sojalecitin, sojalecitiner, sojalecithin, sojabönslecitin, sojabönlecitin, emulgerings medel sojalecitin, soja lecitin
tr: soya lesitini
uk: Соєвий лецитин
zh: 大豆卵磷脂

en: GMO-free soy lecithin, non-gmo soy lecithin
bg: Соев лецитин без ГМО
de: GVO-freies Sojalecithin, gentechnikfreies Soja-Lecithin, Soja-Lecithin gentechnikfrei
fi: GMO-vapaa soijalesitiini
fr: lécithine de soja sans ogm
hr: sojin lecitin bez GMO-a
hu: GMO-mentes szójalecitin
it: Lecitina di soia Ogm free, lecitine di soia Ogm free
nl: GMO-vrije sojalecithine

en: sunflower lecithin
bg: слънчогледов лецитин
ca: lecitina de gira-sol, lecitines de gira-sol
cs: slunečnicový lecitin, slunečnicové lecitiny
da: solsikkelecithin
de: Sonnenblumenlecithine, Sonnenblumenlecithin, Sonnenblumen-Lecithine, Sonnenblumen-Lecithin
el: λεκιθίνες ηλιστροπιου
es: lecitina de girasol, lecitinas de girasol
et: päevalilleletsitiin, päevalille letsitiin
fi: auringonkukkalesitiini, auringonkukkalesitiiniä
fr: lécithine de tournesol
hr: suncokretov lecitin, E322 suncokretov lecitin, lecitin suncokreta
hu: napraforgó lecitin
it: lecitina di girasole, lecitine di girasole
lt: saulėgrąžų lecitinas, saulėgrąžų lecitinai, emulsiklis lecitinai (saulėgrąžų), lecitinai iš saulėgrąžų
lv: lecitinai iš saulègrąžų, saulespuku lecitīns, saulespuķu lecitīns, saulespuķu lecitīni
nb: solsikkelecithin, solsikkelecitin
nl: zonnebloemlecithine, zonnebloem-lecithine
nn: solsikkelecithin
pl: lecytyny ze słonecznika, lecytyna słonecznika, lecytyna słonecznikowa, lecytyny słonecznikowe
pt: lecitina de girassol
ro: lecitina de florarea-soarelui, lecitine din floarea soarelui
ru: лецитин подсолнечный
sk: slnečnicový lecitín
sl: sončnični lecitin
sv: solroslecitin, solroslecithin, solroslecitiner, solros lecitin

en: non-gmo sunflower lecithin
hr: ne-gmo suncokretov lecitin
it: lecitina di girasole non ogm, lecitine di girasole non ogm

en: soya and sunflower lecithin
bg: соев и слънчогледов лецитин
de: Sojalecithin und Sonnenblumen
es: lecitina de soja y girasol
fi: soija- ja auringonkukkalesitiini
fr: lécithine de soja et de tournesol
hr: sojin i suncokretov lecitin
hu: szója- és napraforgólecitin
it: lecitina di soia e di girasole, lecitine di soia e di girasole
lt: sojų ir saulėgrąžų lecitinai